North Carolina, session 2025, SB339.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

REINSTATE STATE BAR COUNCIL APPOINTMENTS TO THE JUDICIAL
STANDARDS COMMISSION
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 7A-375(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Composition. – The Judicial Standards Commission shall consist of the following
residents of North Carolina:
…
(4) Four judges members of the State Bar who have actively practiced in the
courts of the State for at least 10 years, appointed by the General Assembly in
accordance with G.S. 120-121, selected as follows:State Bar Council.
a. One district court judge recommended by the President Pro Tempore
of the Senate.
b. One district court judge recommended by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives.
c. One superior court judge recommended by the President Pro Tempore
of the Senate.
d. One superior court judge recommended by the Speaker of the House
of Representatives.
…."
SECTION 1.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and shall result in the
immediate conclusion of the terms of each of the four members of the Judicial Standards
Commission previously appointed by the General Assembly pursuant to G.S. 7A-375(a)(4).
These four seats on the Judicial Standards Commission shall then be filled for new terms by the
State Bar Council pursuant to G.S. 7A-375(a)(4), as amended by subsection (a) of this section.

REINSTATE FORMER PROVISIONS REGARDING DISCIPLINARY PROCEDURES
FOR JUSTICES AND JUDGES
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 7A-374.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7A-374.2. Definitions.
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section shall apply
throughout this Article:
*S339-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
…
(7) "Public reprimand" means a written action of the Commission issued upon a
finding by the Supreme Court, based upon a written recommendation by the
Commission that a judge has violated the Code of Judicial Conduct and has
engaged in conduct prejudicial to the administration of justice, but that
misconduct is minor. minor and does not warrant a recommendation by the
Commission that the judge be disciplined by the Supreme Court. A public
reprimand may require that the judge follow a corrective course of action.
…."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 7A-376 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7A-376. Grounds for discipline by Commission; public reprimand, censure, suspension,
or removal by the Supreme Court.
(a) The Commission, upon a determination that any judge has engaged in conduct that
violates the North Carolina Code of Judicial Conduct as adopted by the Supreme Court but that
is not of such a nature as would warrant a recommendation of public reprimand, censure,
suspension, or removal, may issue to the judge a private letter of caution.caution or may issue to
the judge a public reprimand.
(b) Upon recommendation of the Commission, the Supreme Court may issue a public
reprimand, censure, suspend, or remove any judge for willful misconduct in office, willful and
persistent failure to perform the judge's duties, habitual intemperance, conviction of a crime
involving moral turpitude, or conduct prejudicial to the administration of justice that brings the
judicial office into disrepute. A judge who is suspended for any of the foregoing reasons shall
receive no compensation during the period of that suspension. A judge who is removed for any
of the foregoing reasons shall receive no retirement compensation and is disqualified from
holding further judicial office.
…."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 7A-377(a4) is reenacted as it existed immediately before its
repeal.
SECTION 2.(d) G.S. 7A-377, as amended by subsection (c) of this section, reads as
rewritten:
"§ 7A-377. Procedures.
(a) Any citizen of the State may file a written complaint with the Commission concerning
the qualifications or conduct of any justice or judge of the General Court of Justice, and thereupon
the Commission shall make such investigation as it deems necessary. The Commission may also
make an investigation on its own motion. The Commission shall not make an investigation,
whether initiated upon its own motion or by written complaint of a citizen of this State, when the
motion or complaint is based substantially on a legal ruling by a district or superior court judge
and the legal ruling has not yet been reviewed and ruled on by either the North Carolina Court of
Appeals or the North Carolina Supreme Court. The Commission is limited to reviewing judicial
conduct, not matters of law. The Commission may issue process to compel the attendance of
witnesses and the production of evidence, to administer oaths, and to punish for contempt. No
justice or judge shall be recommended for public reprimand, censure, suspension, or removal
unless he has been given a hearing affording due process of law.
…
(a4) If, after an investigation is completed, the Commission concludes that a public
reprimand is appropriate, the judge shall be served with a copy of the proposed reprimand and
shall be allowed 20 days within which to accept the reprimand or to reject it and demand, in
writing, that disciplinary proceedings be instituted in accordance with subsection (a5) of this
section. A public reprimand, when issued by the Commission and accepted by the respondent
judge, is not confidential.
Page 2 Senate Bill 339-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a5) If, after an investigation is completed, the Commission concludes that disciplinary
proceedings should be instituted, the notice and statement of charges filed by the Commission,
along with the answer and all other pleadings, remain are not confidential. Disciplinary hearings
ordered by the Commission are not confidential, and recommendations of the Commission to the
Supreme Court, along with the record filed in support of such recommendations are not
confidential. Testimony and other evidence presented to the Commission is privileged in any
action for defamation. At least five members of the Commission must concur in any
recommendation to issue a public reprimand, censure, suspend, or remove any judge. A
respondent who is recommended for public reprimand, censure, suspension, or removal is
entitled to a copy of the proposed record to be filed with the Supreme Court, and if the respondent
has objections to it, to have the record settled by the Commission's chair. The respondent is also
entitled to present a brief and to argue the respondent's case, in person and through counsel, to
the Supreme Court. A majority of the members of the Supreme Court voting must concur in any
order of public reprimand, censure, suspension, or removal. The Supreme Court may approve the
recommendation, remand for further proceedings, or reject the recommendation. A justice of the
Supreme Court or a member of the Commission who is a judge is disqualified from acting in any
case in which he is a respondent.
(a6) Upon issuance of a public reprimand, censure, suspension, or removal by the Supreme
Court, the notice and statement of charges filed by the Commission along with the answer and
all other pleadings, and recommendations of the Commission to the Supreme Court along with
the record filed in support of such recommendations, are no longer confidential.
…."
SECTION 2.(e) Article 30 of Chapter 7A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 7A-378.1. Censure, suspension, or removal of justice of Supreme Court.
(a) The recommendation of the Judicial Standards Commission for censure, suspension,
or removal of any justice of the Supreme Court for any grounds provided by G.S. 7A-376 shall
be made to, and the record filed with, the Court of Appeals, which shall have and shall proceed
under the same authority for censure, suspension, or removal of any justice as is granted to the
Supreme Court under G.S. 7A-376 and G.S. 7A-377(a) for censure, suspension, or removal of
any judge.
(b) The proceeding shall be heard by a panel of the Court of Appeals consisting of the
Chief Judge, who shall be the presiding judge of the panel, and six other judges, the senior in
service, excluding the judge who is chair of the Commission. For good cause, a judge may be
excused by a majority of the panel. If the Chief Judge is excused, the presiding judge shall be
designated by a majority of the panel. The vacancy created by an excused judge shall be filled
by the judge of the court who is next senior in service."
SECTION 2.(f) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
disciplinary actions taken against justices or judges on or after that date, including disciplinary
actions taken in proceedings which began prior to that date.
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Senate Bill 339-First Edition Page 3